Idaho, session 2026, H0873.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-2721, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2721. ELECTION, APPOINTMENT, QUALIFICATIONS AND TENURE OF SUPER-
VISORS. (1) The governing body of the district shall consist of five (5)
supervisors, elected or appointed as provided in this chapter. Elections
shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section and the uni-
form district election law, chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code. If at any time
the supervisors of a district deem it necessary, upon majority vote of the
district board, they may increase the number of supervisors to seven (7) or
decrease the number of supervisors to five (5). If increased, the additional
supervisors shall then be appointed as outlined in this section until such
time as regular district elections for two (2) supervisors in each district.
At that time, those districts having seven (7) supervisors shall then elect
four (4) supervisors for four (4) year terms. The two (2) supervisors ap-
pointed by the district shall be persons who are by training and experience
qualified to perform the specialized services that will be required of them
in the performance of their duties. In the event the supervisors of a dis-
trict, upon majority vote of the district board, deem it necessary to reduce
the number of supervisors to five (5), there must either be two (2) vacant
positions on the board or two (2) of the supervisors must first volunteer to
give up their seats. Written notification of the reduction in supervisors,
signed by the district board chairman, shall then be sent to the state soil
and water conservation commission. Such notification shall also be sent
to the secretary of state to ensure only two (2) or three (3) supervisors
shall be on the ballot for the next election cycle. All supervisors shall be
landowners or farmers of the district where they are elected or appointed and
shall be registered to vote in the state of Idaho.
(2) Within thirty (30) days after the date of issuance by the secretary
of state of a certificate of organization of a soil conservation district,
nominating petitions may be filed with the state soil and water conservation
commission to nominate candidates for supervisors of each district. The
county clerk shall conduct the election for the district in compliance with
chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and shall be the election official for the
district. The election official shall have authority to extend the time


within which nominating petitions may be filed. Nominating petitions shall
be filed with the secretary of the district, and no such nominating petition
shall be accepted by the election official unless it shall be subscribed
by not less than five (5) persons who are qualified electors owning land
or residing within the boundaries of the district. The election official
shall give due notice of an election to be held, subject to the provisions
of section 34-106, Idaho Code, for the election of three (3) supervisors for
the district. The names of all nominees on behalf of whom such nominating
petitions have been filed within the time herein designated shall appear
upon ballots, with directions to choose three (3) names to indicate the
voter's preference. The three (3) candidates who receive the largest num-
ber, respectively, of the votes cast in such election shall be the elected
supervisors for such district.
(3) All elections in districts shall be conducted by the county clerk.
Such election shall be held on the first Tuesday succeeding the first Monday
of November in each even-numbered odd-numbered year. Such elections shall
be in compliance with the provisions of chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code,
and shall be supervised and conducted by the county clerk. The cost of con-
ducting such elections shall be borne by the county that conducted the elec-
tion. The county clerk shall certify to the soil and water conservation dis-
trict the names of the elected supervisors. The soil and water conservation
district shall issue certificates of election to each elected supervisor so
certified. The county clerk or county clerks of the county or counties in
which the district is located shall conduct the election for the soil conser-
vation district, and the county clerk must provide a ballot for the district
election and must provide a process that allows only qualified electors of
the district to vote in that district's election.
(4) In any election for supervisor, if, after the deadline for filing
a declaration of intent as a write-in candidate, it appears that the num-
ber of qualified candidates who have been nominated is equal to the number
of supervisors to be elected, it shall not be necessary for the candidates to
stand for election. The board of supervisors shall declare such candidates
elected as supervisors, and the soil and water conservation district shall
immediately make and deliver to such persons certificates of election.
(5) The supervisors shall designate a chairman and may, from time to
time, change such designation. The term of office of each supervisor shall
be four (4) years commencing on the first day of January next following elec-
tion, except that the two (2) supervisors who are first appointed shall be
designated to serve for terms of two (2) years. Vacancies shall be filled for
the unexpired term. The selection of successors to fill an unexpired term
or for a full term shall be made by a vote of the majority of the supervi-
sors duly qualified and acting at the time the vacancy shall arise, and the
supervisors shall certify the name of the appointed supervisor to the state
soil and water conservation commission. In the event supervisors fail to
appoint a replacement within ninety (90) days following a vacancy, and the
vacancy results in the loss of a quorum of the district board, the governor
shall appoint a replacement sufficient to reestablish a quorum of the dis-
trict board. The soil conservation district shall issue a certificate of
such appointment.


(6) A quorum shall consist of three (3) supervisors for those districts
with a total of five (5) supervisors and four (4) supervisors for those dis-
tricts with a total of seven (7) supervisors, and the concurrence of a major-
ity in any matter within their duties shall be required for its determina-
tion. A supervisor shall be entitled to expenses, including travel expense,
necessarily incurred in the discharge of duties. A supervisor shall receive
no compensation for services from regular district funds, county funds au-
thorized in section 22-2726, Idaho Code, or state funds authorized in sec-
tion 22-2727, Idaho Code.
(7) In the event the district has a special project, approved by the
state soil and water conservation commission, making project funds avail-
able from federal or other sources, a supervisor may receive compensation
not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per day plus actual and necessary
expenses from project funds for services directly related to the project.
(8) The supervisors may employ a secretary, technical experts, and such
other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as they may
require and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation.
The supervisors may call upon the attorney general of the state for such le-
gal services as they may require or may employ their own counsel and legal
staff. The supervisors may delegate to their chairman, to one (1) or more
supervisors, or to one (1) or more agents or employees such powers and du-
ties as they may deem proper. The supervisors shall furnish to the state soil
and water conservation commission, upon request, copies of such ordinances,
rules, orders, contracts, forms and other documents as they shall adopt or
employ and such other information concerning the supervisors' activities as
the commission may require in the performance of the commission's duties un-
der this chapter.
(9) The supervisors shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for
all employees and officers entrusted with funds or property; shall provide
for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all
resolutions and orders issued or adopted; and shall provide for independent
financial audits in accordance with the provisions of section 67-450B, Idaho
Code. Supervisors shall be subject to recall in accordance with the provi-
sions of chapter 17, title 34, Idaho Code.
(10) The supervisors may invite the legislative body of a municipality
or county located near the territory comprised within the district to desig-
nate a representative to advise and consult with the supervisors of the dis-
trict on all questions of program and policy that may affect the property,
water supply, or other interests of such municipality or county.
(11) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
election for supervisor scheduled for November 2026 shall instead be held on
the Tuesday following the first Monday in November 2027 and shall be for a
term of four (4) years; and the election for supervisor scheduled for Novem-
ber 2028 shall instead be held on the Tuesday following the first Monday in
November 2029 and shall be for a term of four (4) years.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-308. MAIL BALLOT PRECINCT. (1) A precinct within the county that
contains no more than one hundred forty (140) registered electors at the


last general election may be designated by the board of county commissioners
as a mail ballot precinct no later than April 1 in an even-numbered year.
Such a designation shall apply thereafter to all elections conducted within
the precinct until revoked by the board of county commissioners or until
the precinct contains one hundred fifty-one (151) registered electors at
the last general election. Having designated a mail ballot precinct, there
shall be no voting place established within the precinct. Elections in a
mail ballot precinct shall be conducted in a manner consistent with absentee
voting with the special provisions provided in this section.
(2) The clerk shall issue a ballot, by mail, to every registered voter
in a mail ballot precinct and shall affix postage to the return envelope suf-
ficient to return the ballot.
(3) The ballot shall be mailed no sooner than twenty-four (24) forty-
five (45) days prior to the election day and no later than the fourteenth
eleventh day prior to the election.
(4) The clerk shall make necessary provisions to segregate mail bal-
lot precinct ballots by precinct and, for all purposes of the election, the
precinct integrity shall be maintained.
(5) The clerk shall make registration available in the office of the
clerk on election day for any individual who is eligible to vote and who re-
sides in a mail ballot precinct and has not previously registered. The clerk
shall provide an official polling place in the office of the clerk, and a
qualified elector who registers on election day and resides in a mail ballot
precinct shall be allowed to vote at the office of the clerk.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, electors
who have designated a political party affiliation pursuant to section
34-404, Idaho Code, shall receive the primary election ballot for that
party pursuant to sections 34-904 and 34-904A, Idaho Code.
(b) Electors who have designated a political party affiliation pur-
suant to section 34-404, Idaho Code, may receive the primary election
ballot of a political party other than the political party such elector
is affiliated with if such other political party has provided notifica-
tion to the secretary of state that identifies the political party such
elector is affiliated with, as provided for in section 34-904A(2)(b),
Idaho Code.
(7) For "unaffiliated" electors, in order to receive a political
party's primary election ballot pursuant to section 34-904A, Idaho Code, the
county clerk shall mail a ballot request form for the primary election ballot
to the electors in a mail ballot precinct for the electors to use in selecting
the party ballot they choose to receive.
(a) In the event that more than one (1) political party allows electors
designated as "unaffiliated" to vote in their party's primary election
pursuant to section 34-904A, Idaho Code, an elector designated as "un-
affiliated" shall indicate on the form such elector's choice of the po-
litical party's primary election ballot in order to vote in that party's
primary election.
(b) In the event no more than one (1) political party allows electors
designated as "unaffiliated" to vote in their party's primary election
pursuant to section 34-904A, Idaho Code, an elector designated as "un-
affiliated" shall indicate on the form that political party's primary


election ballot in order to vote in that political party's primary elec-
tion.
(c) If an elector designated as "unaffiliated" is not permitted to
vote in a political party's primary election as provided for in section
34-904A, Idaho Code, such elector shall receive a nonpartisan ballot.
(d) If an elector designated as "unaffiliated" does not indicate on the
form a choice of political party's primary election ballot, such elec-
tor shall receive a nonpartisan ballot.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-1410, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1410. CANVASSING OF ELECTION RESULTS. The board of county commis-
sioners shall conduct the canvass of the election results within ten (10)
nine (9) days after the election, in the manner provided in chapter 12, ti-
tle 34, Idaho Code. The county clerk shall certify the election results to
the clerk of each political subdivision for which an election was held. Each
political subdivision shall issue the appropriate certificates of election.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.